Nebraska, session 109, LB395.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB395 LB395
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-1204.05, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
28-1204.05 (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, a person under the age of twenty-five years who knowingly
possesses a firearm commits the offense of possession of a firearm by a
prohibited juvenile offender if he or she has previously been adjudicated
an offender in juvenile court for an act which would constitute a felony
or an act which would constitute a misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence. This subsection includes an offense for which a juvenile record
has been sealed upon termination of probation.
(2) Possession of a firearm by a prohibited juvenile offender is a
Class IV felony for a first offense and a Class IIIA felony for a second
or subsequent offense.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the possession
of firearms by members of the armed forces of the United States, active
or reserve, National Guard of this state, or Reserve Officers Training
Corps or peace officers or other duly authorized law enforcement officers
when on duty or training.
(4)(a) Prior to reaching the age of twenty-five years, a person
subject to the prohibition of subsection (1) of this section may file a
petition for exemption from such prohibition and thereby have his or her
right to possess a firearm reinstated. A petitioner who is younger than
nineteen years of age shall petition the juvenile court in which he or
she was adjudicated for the underlying offense. A petitioner who is
nineteen years of age or older shall petition the district court in the
county in which he or she resides.
(b) In determining whether to grant a petition filed under
subdivision (4)(a) of this section, the court shall consider:
(i) The behavior of the person after the underlying adjudication;
(ii) The likelihood that the person will engage in further criminal
activity; and
-2-

LB395 LB395
2025 2025
(iii) Any other information the court considers relevant.
(c) The court may grant a petition filed under subdivision (4)(a) of
this section and issue an order exempting the person from the prohibition
of subsection (1) of this section when in the opinion of the court the
order will be in the best interests of the person and consistent with the
public welfare.
(5) The fact that a person subject to the prohibition under
subsection (1) of this section has reached the age of twenty-five or that
a court has granted a petition under subdivision (4)(a) of this section
shall not be construed to mean that such adjudication has been set aside.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the setting aside
of such an adjudication or conviction except as otherwise provided by
law.
(6) For purposes of this section, misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence has the same meaning as in section 28-1206.
Sec. 2. Section 43-2,108.05, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2,108.05 (1) If the court orders the record of a juvenile sealed,
the court shall:
(a) Order that all records, including any information or other data
concerning any proceedings relating to the offense, including the arrest,
taking into custody, petition, complaint, indictment, information, trial,
hearing, adjudication, correctional supervision, dismissal, or other
disposition or sentence, be deemed never to have occurred;
(b) Send notice of the order to seal the record (i) if the record
includes impoundment or prohibition to obtain a license or permit
pursuant to section 43-287, to the Department of Motor Vehicles, (ii) if
the juvenile whose record has been ordered sealed was a ward of the state
at the time the proceeding was initiated or if the Department of Health
and Human Services was a party in the proceeding, to such department, and
(iii) to law enforcement agencies, county attorneys, and city attorneys
-3-

LB395 LB395
2025 2025
referenced in the court record;
(c) Order all notified under subdivision (1)(b) of this section to
seal all records pertaining to the offense;
(d) If the case was transferred from district court to juvenile
court or was transferred under section 43-282, send notice of the order
to seal the record to the transferring court; and
(e) Explain to the juvenile using developmentally appropriate
language what sealing the record means. The explanation shall be given
verbally if the juvenile is present in the court at the time the court
issues the sealing order and by written notice sent by regular mail to
the juvenile's last-known address if the juvenile is not present in the
court at the time the court issues the sealing order. If applicable, the
explanation shall inform the juvenile that the juvenile is prohibited
from possessing a firearm under section 28-1204.05. The sealing order
shall include contact information for each government agency subject to
the sealing order.
(2) The effect of having a record sealed is that thereafter no
person is allowed to release any information concerning such record,
except as provided by this section. After a record is sealed, the person
whose record was sealed can respond to any public inquiry as if the
offense resulting in such record never occurred. A government agency and
any other public office or agency shall reply to any public inquiry that
no information exists regarding a sealed record. Except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, an order to seal the record applies to
every government agency and any other public office or agency that has a
record relating to the offense, regardless of whether it receives notice
of the hearing on the sealing of the record or a copy of the order. Upon
the written request of a person whose record has been sealed and the
presentation of a copy of such order, a government agency or any other
public office or agency shall seal all records pertaining to the offense.
(3) A sealed record is accessible to the individual who is the
-4-

LB395 LB395
2025 2025
subject of the sealed record and any persons authorized by such
individual, law enforcement officers, county attorneys, and city
attorneys in the investigation, prosecution, and sentencing of crimes, to
the sentencing judge in the sentencing of criminal defendants, to a judge
making a determination whether to transfer a case to or from juvenile
court, to any attorney representing the subject of the sealed record, and
to the Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare pursuant to an
investigation conducted under the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska
Child Welfare Act. Inspection of records that have been ordered sealed
under section 43-2,108.04 may be made by the following persons or for the
following purposes:
(a) By the court or by any person allowed to inspect such records by
an order of the court for good cause shown;
(b) By the court, city attorney, or county attorney for purposes of
collection of any remaining parental support or obligation balances under
section 43-290;
(c) By the Nebraska Probation System for purposes of juvenile intake
services, for presentence and other probation investigations, and for the
direct supervision of persons placed on probation and by the Department
of Correctional Services, the Office of Juvenile Services, a juvenile
assessment center, a criminal detention facility, a juvenile detention
facility, or a staff secure juvenile facility, for an individual
committed to it, placed with it, or under its care;
(d) By the Department of Health and Human Services for purposes of
juvenile intake services, the preparation of case plans and reports, the
preparation of evaluations, compliance with federal reporting
requirements, or the supervision and protection of persons placed with
the department or for licensing or certification purposes under sections
71-1901 to 71-1906.01, the Child Care Licensing Act, or the Children's
Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act;
(e) By the individual who is the subject of the sealed record and by
-5-

LB395 LB395
2025 2025
persons authorized by such individual. The individual shall provide
satisfactory verification of his or her identity;
(f) At the request of a party in a civil action that is based on a
case that has a sealed record, as needed for the civil action. The party
also may copy the sealed record as needed for the civil action. The
sealed record shall be used solely in the civil action and is otherwise
confidential and subject to this section;
(g) By persons engaged in bona fide research, with the permission of
the court or the State Court Administrator, only if the research results
in no disclosure of the person's identity and protects the
confidentiality of the sealed record; or
(h) By a law enforcement agency if the individual whose record has
been sealed applies for employment with the law enforcement agency; or .
(i) By a law enforcement agency to determine if a person under the
age of twenty-five years has been previously adjudicated for an act which
would constitute a felony or a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence as
defined in subsection (6) of section 28-1204.05 when such person applies
for a permit under the Concealed Handgun Permit Act or a certificate to
purchase, lease, rent, or transfer a handgun under section 69-2401, et
seq.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the Department of Health and
Human Services from releasing information from sealed records in the
performance of its duties with respect to the supervision and protection
of persons served by the department.
(5) In any application for employment, bonding, license, education,
or other right or privilege, any appearance as a witness, or any other
public inquiry, a person cannot be questioned with respect to any offense
for which the record is sealed. If an inquiry is made in violation of
this subsection, the person may respond as if the offense never occurred.
Applications for employment shall contain specific language that states
that the applicant is not obligated to disclose a sealed record.
-6-

LB395 LB395
2025 2025
Employers shall not ask if an applicant has had a record sealed. The
Department of Labor shall develop a link on the department's website to
inform employers that employers cannot ask if an applicant had a record
sealed and that an application for employment shall contain specific
language that states that the applicant is not obligated to disclose a
sealed record.
(6) Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be guilty
of a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. Original sections 28-1204.05 and 43-2,108.05, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-